Washington statutes.
RCW 7.28.240

Action between cotenants.

In an action by a tenant in common, or a joint tenant of real property against his or her cotenant, the plaintiff must show, in addition to his or her evidence of right, that the defendant either denied the plaintiff's right or did some act amounting to such denial.

[ 2011 c 336 s 180; Code 1881 s 547; 1877 p 114 s 551; 1869 p 130 s 499; RRS s 805.]